bng.dix
		<e lm="abalambana"><i>abalamban</i><par n="aBimAn/a_n"/></e>
		<e lm="hala"><i>hal</i><par n="aparAX/a_n"/></e>
		<e lm="sizdZi"><i>sizdZi</i><par n="Cabi_n"/></e>
		<e lm="KutA WAkA tambuGara"><i>KutA<b/>WAkA<b/>tambuGar</i><par n="hAsapAwAl/a_n"/></e>
		<e lm="bAgAna"><i>bAgAn</i><par n="aparAX/a_n"/></e>
		<e lm="manxira"><i>manxira</i><par n="aparAX/a_n"/></e>
		<e lm="prAsAxa"><i>prAsAxa</i><par n="aparAX/a_n"/></e>
		<e lm="prinsa"><i>prinsa</i><par n="aXyApak/a_n"/></e>
		<e lm="aswra-saswra"><i>aswra-saswr</i><par n="aparAX/a_n"/></e>
		<e lm="pikanika"><i>pikanik</i><par n="aparAX/a_n"/></e>
		<e lm="rAjya"><i>rAjy</i><par n="aparAX/a_n"/></e>
		<e lm="rAjaXAnI"><i>rAjaXAnI</i><par n="Cabi_n"/></e>
		<e lm="Aitema"><i>Aitem</i><par n="aparAX/a_n"/></e>
		<e lm="trAnsaporta"><i>trAnsaport</i><par n="aparAX/a_n"/></e>
		<e lm="karporeSana"><i>karporeSan</i><par n="aBimAn/a_n"/></e>
		<e lm="sWAna"><i>sWAna</i><par n="aparAX/a_n"/></e>
		<e lm="bAjAra"><i>bAjAra</i><par n="aparAX/a_n"/></e>
		<e lm="mArbela"><i>mArbela</i><par n="aparAX/a_n"/></e>
		<e lm="mUrwi"><i>mUrwi</i><par n="Cabi_n"/></e>
		<e lm="kalasI"><i>kalasI</i><par n="Cabi_n"/></e>
		<e lm="juwA"><i>juwA</i><par n="gAmaCA_n"/></e>
		<e lm="prajanana"><i>prajanan</i><par n="aBimAn/a_n"/></e>
		<e lm="KAxyagrahaNa"><i>KAxyagrahaN</i><par n="aBimAn/a_n"/></e>
		<e lm="AkarRaNa"><i>AkarRaN</i><par n="aBimAn/a_n"/></e>
		<e lm="rAnI"><i>rAnI</i><par n="kAkI_n"/></e>
		<e lm="rAnI-kA-bAga"><i>rAnI-kA-bAg</i><par n="aBimAn/a_n"/></e>
		<e lm="nIla"><i>nIl</i><par n="aparAX/a_n"/></e>
		<e lm="lohAGara"><i>lohAGar</i><par n="aparAX/a_n"/></e>
		<e lm="GAsa"><i>GAs</i><par n="hAsapAwAl/a_n"/></e>
		<e lm="sOnxarya"><i>sOnxary</i><par n="aBimAn/a_n"/></e>
		<e lm="xarSaka"><i>xarSak</i><par n="cil/a_n"/></e>
		<e lm="parixarSana"><i>parixarSan</i><par n="aBimAn/a_n"/></e>
		<e lm="cawwara"><i>cawwar</i><par n="aBimAn/a_n"/></e>
		<e lm="sAla"><i>sAl</i><par n="hAsapAwAl/a_n"/></e>
		<e lm="kApadZa"><i>kApadZ</i><par n="hAsapAwAl/a_n"/></e>
		<e lm="gayZanA"><i>gayZanA</i><par n="gAmaCA_n"/></e>

<e lm=dasa><i>aBimAn/a_n</i><par n=aBimAn/a_n/></e><e lm=dasa><i>aparAX/a_n</i><par n=aparAX/a_n/></e><e lm=dasa><i>hAsapAwAl/a_n</i><par n=hAsapAwAl/a_n/></e><e lm=dasa><i>cil/a_n</i><par n=cil/a_n/></e><e lm=dasa><i>aXyApak/a_n</i><par n=aXyApak/a_n/></e>  </section>
</dictionary>
